Alaska, session 34, SB163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 12 * Section 1. AS 18.56.430, 18.56.450; AS 38.05.874; AS 42.45.040; AS 43.90.400; 01 AS 44.33.242; AS 45.81.110; AS 45.88.110; AS 45.98.015; and AS 47.27.075 are repealed. 02 * Sec. 2. Section 2, ch. 16, SLA 1998, is repealed. 03 * Sec 3. This Act takes effect June 30, 2025. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.